Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 17 Uniform Act for Simplification of Fiduciary Security Transfers

53-17-1 through 53-17-11.
[Repealed]

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 827, §§ 1-10 and Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; repealed by Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

53-17-12.
Georgia Tables.

Click here to view Table 1

Click to view

Click here to view Table 2

Click to view

Click here to view Table 3

Click to view

Click here to view Table 4

Click to view

Click here to view Table 5

Click to view

Click here to view Table 6

Click to view

Click here to view Table 7

Click to view

Click here to view Table 8

Click to view

Click here to view Table 9

Click to view

Click here to view Table 10

Click to view

Click here to view Table 11

Click to view

Click here to view Table 11A

Click to view

Click here to view Table 11B

Click to view

Click here to view Table 12

Click to view

Click here to view Table 13

Click to view

Click here to view Table 14

Click to view

Click here to view Table 15

Click to view

IMAGE

Click to view

11/09/2022 11:22AM FROM_EDEN_\\fabwebd5\data\EDEN_Prod\shared\ProductBuild\FolioOutput_GACODE_1-1668010777087

11/09/2022 11:22AM Pete_NFO_build

11/18/2022 05:44AM Pete_NFO_build

2022/11/21
03:24:02 IET005-ChkNukSliceNFO Validate links, remove links

11/21/2022 03:41AM Pete_CheckNuke_4xNFO_build